Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-1203
City or village; return grant; when.

If a city or village fails to engage in the demolition of the commercial property identified in the application for a grant under the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program within twenty-four months after receiving the grant, the city or village shall return the grant to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. The department shall remit such grant money to the State Treasurer for credit to the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 42.